Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202520-321
Multiple listing service; other service, organization, or facility; discriminatory practices prohibited.

It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership or participation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion, national origin, disability, familial status, sex, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 5, p. 542;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 66;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-109;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 22;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 15.